Utah statutes.
31A-2-211.   Rules and forms during transition period.
(1)  The commissioner's rules adopted under former Title 31 are rescinded
unless continued under Subsection (3).
(2)  Between May 1, 1985, and July 1, 1986, the commissioner may prepare and
adopt rules to implement or supplement provisions under Title 31A.  These
rules are effective on July 1, 1986, or on the effective date of the
particular provision, if that is later than July 1, 1986.
(3)  The commissioner may issue orders declaring that all or part of a rule in
effect under former Title 31 remains in effect until a date specified under
the order, which date may not be later than June 30, 1989.  No rule continued
under this subsection may be inconsistent with other provisions under Title
31A. Notice of the order shall be given under Section 31A-2-303.
(4)  Every form used, issued, or required by the Insurance Department and
approved by the commissioner or otherwise legitimately in use immediately
prior to the effective date of this title may continue to be used until
replaced in accordance with the provisions of this title.
